Utah statutes.
76-5-102.7.   Assault against health care provider and emergency medical service worker -- Penalty.

(1)  A person who assaults a health care provider or emergency medical service worker is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if:

(a)  the person knew that the victim was a health care provider or emergency medical service worker; and

(b)  the health care provider or emergency medical service worker was performing emergency or life saving duties within the scope of his authority at the time of the assault.

(2)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Emergency medical service worker" means a person certified under Section 26-8a-302.

(b)  "Health care provider" has the meaning as provided in Section 78B-3-403.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

